src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_nouns.lexc
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:omishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:omishan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:ominiban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:omiwaabanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:ominiban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:omibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:ominiban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:omiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:ominiban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:omibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:oniban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:owaabanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:oniban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:obanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:oniban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:owaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:oniban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:obaniin EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD, Class: NAD_irrCw                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=O                                           !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Class=NAD_irrCw_Flags_Prefix=O
@U.Order.Other@ NAD_Class=NAD_irrCw_Prefix=O_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD, Class: NAD_irrCw, Prefix: O, Order: Other             !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Class=NAD_irrCw_Prefix=O_Order=Other_Endings
+NAD+Dim+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:oonsiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:oonsiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:oonsiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:oonsan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Pej+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:oonzhishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Pej+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:oonzhishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Pej+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:oonzhishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Pej+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:oonzhishan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Poss+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:oonsiminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Poss+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:oonsimiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Poss+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:oonsiminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Poss+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:oonsiman EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:oonsimishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:oonsimishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:oonsimishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:oonsimishan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:oonsimiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:oonsimiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:oonsimibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:oonsimibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:oonsimiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:oonsimibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:oonsiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:oonsiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:oonsibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:oonsibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:oonsiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Dim+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:oonsibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:oniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:owaan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:oniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:an EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pej+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:oshiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pej+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:oshiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pej+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:oshiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pej+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:oshan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:ominiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:omiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:ominiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:oman EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:omishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:omishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:omishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:omishan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:omiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:omiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:omibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:omibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:omiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:omibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:owaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:owaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:obanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:obaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:owaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:obanen EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA                                                         !
!         Prefixes                                                             !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Prefix
@P.Prefix.GI@:@P.Prefix.GI@gi NA_PrefixBoundary ;
@P.Prefix.NI@:@P.Prefix.NI@ni NA_PrefixBoundary ;
@P.Prefix.NONE@ NA_PrefixBoundary ;
@P.Prefix.O@:@P.Prefix.O@o NA_PrefixBoundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA                                                         !
!         Morpheme boundary between prefix and stem                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< PrenounRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA                                                         !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary
0:%>%> NA_Class=NA_C_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_C                                            !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Stems
aanikoobijigan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
aazhide-waagosh NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
abinoojiinyens NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
agonaan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
agwinaan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
akakojiishens NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
amikoons NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
angogos NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
animikiins NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
anishinaabe-bakwezhigan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
anokii-minjikaawan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
apateshiwish NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
apisitaagan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
asawens NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
ashigan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
ataadiwin NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
awakaan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
baaka'aakwaan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
baasoowens NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
bagaki-ozaawi-miigwan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
bakwakwaawaajiinh NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
banaakosh NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
bashkwadaash NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
beshigwan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
bibine-bakwezhigan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
bigishki-zhooniyaans NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
biindaakwaan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
biisi-bakwezhigan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
biitoo-giboodiyegwaazon NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
biiwaabiko-zhooniyaans NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
bimaagiwebishkigan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
bimiwizhiwewidaabaan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
bingoshens NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
bizhikiwi-doodooshim NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
bootaagan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
dagwaagishib NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
danens NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
diba'igiiziswaanens NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
ditibibidewi-zhooshkwaada'aagan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
doodooshaaboo-akik NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
esibanimizh NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
gaagiigidoo-bineshiin' NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
gaasha'igan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
gagaanwaabiigi-bakwezhigan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
gashkigwaason NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
gibaakwa'waagan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
gibwanaakoshens NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
gichi-mookomaan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
gidagaa-bizhiwayaan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
giigoonyensikaan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
giishka'aakwewidaabaan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
giizhkizhigewidaabaan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
giizhoozidaan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
gikinoo'amawaagan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
gizhaagamizigan-akikoons NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
gookoosh NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
gwekiwebinigan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
ikwe-giboodiyegwaazon NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
ininaandago-bigiw NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
ishkwejiiyaagan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
jiibay NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
liner:biitoonigan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
maamaagweginwe-midaas NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
maanataan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
maanitaanish NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
majigikwewis NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
makade-ma'iingan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
makadewanasad NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
makopin NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
mandaaminaakopwaagan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
manidoominensikaan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
manijoosh NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
mashkodesimin NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
mazaanens NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
mazinichigaans NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
midaasoobii'igan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
miigwanens NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
miishi-bagesaan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
mikwamiikaan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
misawenjigan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
mishtadimoons NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
miskojiisimin NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
mitigomin NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
moozowayaan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
naanaazikizigwagoons NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
nemaabiins NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
niizho-biiwaabikoons NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
niso-zhooniyaans NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
obiisinibiiway NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
odiniigan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
ojiingwanens NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
onaman NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
oshkinawens NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
ozagadigom NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
waabanangosiins NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
waabishkiminens NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
waasamowi-ditibiwebishkigan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
wadway NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
webinigan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
wiinisik NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
zaasaagininjiishin:zhaawanoowininiw NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
zenibaa-asabaabis NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
zhigaagwayaan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
zhiiwisijigan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
zhoominensiwi-bakwezhigan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
zhooshkwega'igan NA_Class=NA_C_Boundary ;
